Idaho, session 2026, H0867.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the programs listed in Gen-
eral Government the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION:
A. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $214,500 $148,800 $363,300
Permanent Building
Fund 161,400 18,100 $60,600 240,100
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 761,900 118,000 879,900
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 25,200 25,200
Employee Group Insurance
Fund 89,800 100 89,900
Retained Risk
Fund 38,200 38,200
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 24,400 0 0 24,400
TOTAL $1,315,400 $285,000 $60,600 $1,661,000
B. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,660,400 $1,660,400
Permanent Building
Fund $3,508,700 929,300 4,438,000
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 3,250,900 12,529,400 15,780,300
TOTAL $6,759,600 $15,119,100 $21,878,700
C. PURCHASING:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $1,988,600 $397,600 $2,386,200
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 249,000 415,600 664,600
TOTAL $2,237,600 $813,200 $3,050,800


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
D. INSURANCE MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Employee Group Insurance
Fund $839,500 $449,800 $1,289,300
Retained Risk
Fund 938,200 251,500 1,189,700
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 232,700 103,100 335,800
TOTAL $2,010,400 $804,400 $2,814,800
E. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $765,800 $765,800
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 441,100 $716,200 1,157,300
TOTAL $1,206,900 $716,200 $1,923,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $13,529,900 $17,737,900 $60,600 $31,328,400
II. CAPITOL COMMISSION:
FROM:
Capitol Commission Operating
Fund $142,000 $142,000
Capitol Maintenance Reserve
Fund 0 $2,200,000 2,200,000
TOTAL $142,000 $2,200,000 $2,342,000
III. COMMISSION ON AGING:
FROM:
General
Fund $785,800 $347,200 $5,056,800 $6,189,800
Federal Grant
Fund 930,800 497,300 $74,700 9,021,900 10,524,700
TOTAL $1,716,600 $844,500 $74,700 $14,078,700 $16,714,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. COMMISSION ON THE ARTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $438,900 $156,300 $20,700 $310,200 $926,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 39,800 66,500 106,300
Federal Grant
Fund 525,900 193,500 29,200 500,200 1,248,800
TOTAL $964,800 $389,600 $49,900 $876,900 $2,281,200
V. COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,073,800 $141,100 $200 $521,800 $1,736,900
Randolph Sheppard
Fund 27,600 100,100 127,700
Rehabilitation Revenue and Refunds
Fund 34,300 13,000 47,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 28,100 56,300 84,400
Adaptive Aids and Appliances
Fund 28,600 62,900 91,500
Federal Grant
Fund 2,995,800 718,900 0 470,300 4,185,000
TOTAL $4,098,200 $1,012,900 $200 $1,161,500 $6,272,800
VI. OFFICE OF DRUG POLICY:
FROM:
General
Fund $316,500 $66,200 $382,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 24,500 24,500
Federal Grant
Fund 338,400 989,700 $3,209,800 4,537,900
TOTAL $654,900 $1,080,400 $3,209,800 $4,945,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VII. OFFICE OF ENERGY AND MINERAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $274,700 $62,000 $336,700
Renewable Energy Resources
Fund 206,900 42,500 249,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 21,800 12,000 33,800
Petroleum Price Violation
Fund 266,400 178,600 $15,900 $58,000 518,900
Federal Grant
Fund 776,400 467,200 0 10,398,900 11,642,500
TOTAL $1,546,200 $762,300 $15,900 $10,456,900 $12,781,300
VIII. DIVISION OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,075,400 $180,000 $2,255,400
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 117,900 10,000 127,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 141,300 48,000 189,300
Administrative Code
Fund 480,000 201,600 681,600
American Rescue Plan
Fund $20,589,700 20,589,700
ARPA Homeowner Assistance
Fund 20,000,000 20,000,000
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 0 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
TOTAL $2,814,600 $1,439,600 $40,589,700 $44,843,900
IX. DIVISION OF HUMAN RESOURCES:
FROM:
Division of Human Resources
Fund $18,170,300 $1,450,600 $19,620,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
X. OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,880,800 $1,800,600 $3,681,400
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 28,014,800 8,881,400 $463,300 37,359,500
TOTAL $29,895,600 $10,682,000 $463,300 $41,040,900
XI. STATE LIQUOR DIVISION, OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $21,110,200 $5,585,700 $4,902,000 $31,597,900
XII. MILITARY DIVISION:
A. MILITARY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,814,800 $895,100 $273,300 $3,983,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 467,300 36,500 503,800
Emergency Medical Services
Fund 261,900 261,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 765,900 765,900
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 3,563,500 1,137,600 $28,800 0 4,729,900
TOTAL $7,107,500 $2,835,100 $28,800 $273,300 $10,244,700
B. FEDERAL/STATE AGREEMENTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,425,600 $1,071,000 $2,496,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,211,000 435,200 2,646,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 36,186,000 32,396,300 68,582,300
TOTAL $39,822,600 $33,902,500 $73,725,100
C. OFFICE OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,532,000 $251,900 $2,783,900
Federal Grant
Fund 3,566,300 5,148,600 $2,500,000 $11,225,600 22,440,500
TOTAL $6,098,300 $5,400,500 $2,500,000 $11,225,600 $25,224,400
D. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $71,400 $145,000 $216,400
Emergency Medical Services
Fund 2,253,900 1,156,000 3,409,900
Emergency Medical Services III
Fund $1,700,000 1,700,000
TSE Registry
Fund 132,800 327,000 459,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 824,800 551,400 1,376,200
Federal Grant
Fund 60,000 120,000 0 180,000
TOTAL $3,342,900 $2,299,400 $1,700,000 $7,342,300
DIVISION
TOTAL $56,371,300 $44,437,500 $2,528,800 $13,198,900 $116,536,500
XIII. PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM:
A. RETIREMENT ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
PERSI Administrative
Fund $7,189,500 $2,567,200 $9,756,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Judges' Retirement
Fund 84,600 1,000 85,600
TOTAL $7,274,100 $2,568,200 $9,842,300
B. PORTFOLIO INVESTMENT:
FROM:
PERSI Special
Fund $1,033,500 $200,500 $1,234,000
DIVISION
TOTAL $8,307,600 $2,768,700 $11,076,300
XIV. OFFICE OF SPECIES CONSERVATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,001,000 $760,100 $1,761,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 50,000 50,000
Federal Grant
Fund 812,100 174,100 $29,000 $17,140,000 18,155,200
TOTAL $1,813,100 $984,200 $29,000 $17,140,000 $19,966,300
XV. STEM ACTION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $774,400 $1,195,700 $90,500 $1,000,000 $3,060,600
STEM Education
Fund 0 100,000 0 2,829,900 2,929,900
TOTAL $774,400 $1,295,700 $90,500 $3,829,900 $5,990,500
XVI. WOLF DEPREDATION CONTROL BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $372,400 $372,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
XVII. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL:
FROM:
Workforce Development Training
Fund $569,200 $457,600 $7,684,500 $8,711,300
In-Demand Careers
Fund 1,050,900 3,038,300 70,766,700 74,855,900
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 197,200 637,200 834,400
Federal Grant
Fund 134,000 50,000 0 184,000
TOTAL $1,951,300 $4,183,100 $78,451,200 $84,585,600
XVIII. BOARD OF TAX APPEALS:
FROM:
General
Fund $549,600 $55,800 $51,900 $657,300
XIX. STATE TAX COMMISSION:
A. GENERAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,763,300 $5,554,300 $95,500 $14,413,100
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 148,500 604,800 2,500 755,800
Administration and Accounting
Fund 42,500 28,800 2,500 73,800
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 822,800 1,130,400 5,000 1,958,200
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 21,500 0 21,500
TOTAL $9,777,100 $7,339,800 $105,500 $17,222,400
B. AUDIT DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,471,900 $559,200 $114,000 $9,145,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 2,136,900 507,200 2,644,100
Administration and Accounting
Fund 19,400 24,400 43,800
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 2,237,500 360,400 0 2,597,900
TOTAL $12,865,700 $1,451,200 $114,000 $14,430,900
C. COMPLIANCE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,954,500 $1,109,100 $114,000 $10,177,600
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 270,600 29,600 0 300,200
TOTAL $9,225,100 $1,138,700 $114,000 $10,477,800
D. REVENUE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,407,700 $1,318,000 $5,725,700
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 4,000 4,000
Administration and Accounting
Fund 100,500 17,100 117,600
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 816,400 262,100 $2,300 1,080,800
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 26,400 0 26,400
TOTAL $5,324,600 $1,627,600 $2,300 $6,954,500
E. PROPERTY TAX:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,502,400 $265,300 $4,767,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 201,000 201,000
TOTAL $4,502,400 $466,300 $4,968,700
DIVISION
TOTAL $41,694,900 $12,023,600 $335,800 $54,054,300
GRANDTOTAL $205,963,500 $107,248,500 $10,742,000 $183,054,100 $507,008,100
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in General Government is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Administration .................................136.00
Commission on Aging ...........................................15.00
Commission on the Arts .........................................8.00
Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired ..................43.12
Office of Drug Policy ..........................................6.00
Office of Energy and Mineral Resources .........................11.00
Division of Financial Management ..............................20.00
Division of Human Resources ..................................166.00
Office of Information Technology Services .....................243.00
State Liquor Division ........................................253.25
Military Division ...........................................460.64
Public Employee Retirement System of Idaho .....................81.00
Office of Species Conservation ................................16.00
STEM Action Center .............................................7.00
Workforce Development Council .................................14.00
Board of Tax Appeals ...........................................4.00
State Tax Commission .........................................445.00
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND ACCOUNTING SERVICES
FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $1,737,500 from the Permanent Building Fund to the Adminis-
tration and Accounting Services Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter
as practicable, for the Capitol Mall Facilities payment in the Division of
Public Works due in fiscal year 2027.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER TO THE CAPITOL COMMISSION OPERATING FUND.
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Administration for the
Idaho State Capitol Commission and the Office of the State Controller shall
transfer $250,000 from the Capitol Maintenance Reserve Fund to the Capitol


Commission Operating Fund on July 1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practica-
ble, for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO STATE CAPITOL COM-
MISSION. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Administration
for the Idaho State Capitol Commission any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of Administration
for the Idaho State Capitol Commission from the Capitol Commission Operating
Fund and the Capitol Maintenance Reserve Fund for fiscal year 2026 to be used
for nonrecurring expenditures for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 6. CASH TRANSFER TO THE GOVERNOR'S RESIDENCE FUND. Notwith-
standing the provisions of Section 57-1108, Idaho Code, and any other
provision of law to the contrary, of the amount appropriated in Section 1
of this act to the Department of Administration for the Management Services
Program from the Permanent Building Fund, the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $60,600 to the Governor's Residence Fund on July 1, 2026, or
as soon thereafter as practicable, for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027, to be used for the Governor's housing stipend.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR ENERGY RESILIENCY GRANTS.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources from the Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund for the purpose of the Energy Resiliency Grant Program for fiscal year
2026, in an amount not to exceed $10,609,800 from the Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to the Energy Re-
siliency Grant Program for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount,
by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office
prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION FOR THE MILITARY DIVISION. The
Military Division is hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for
the Idaho Office of Emergency Management's Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027, for the purpose of covering
incurred costs arising out of hazardous substance incidents.
SECTION 9. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT
SYSTEM OF IDAHO. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 59-1311(4)(d),
Idaho Code, moneys appropriated in Section 1 of this act for the Portfolio
Investment Program within the Public Employee Retirement System of Idaho are
for administrative costs of the Portfolio Investment Program as provided in
Section 59-1311(3), Idaho Code. Amounts necessary to pay all other invest-
ment expenses related to the Portfolio Investment Program are perpetually
appropriated to the Retirement Board as provided in Section 59-1311(4)(a),
(b) and (c), Idaho Code.


SECTION 10. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RE-
COVERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development
Council any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Workforce Development Council from the ARPA State Fiscal
Recovery Fund for fiscal year 2026, to be used for workforce training grants
and childcare infrastructure grants for the period July 1, 2026, through
June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappro-
priation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative
Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development Council any
unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
Workforce Development Council from the In-Demand Careers Fund for fiscal
year 2026, to be used for Idaho Launch grants for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the
reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Leg-
islative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized
herein.
SECTION 12. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
TRAINING FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development
Council any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Workforce Development Council from the Workforce Development
Training Fund for fiscal year 2026, to be used for semiconductor grants for
the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 13. PLAN STRUCTURE. The Office of Group Insurance shall main-
tain the current health insurance plan structure and benefit package for
state employees. Adherence with the plan structure shall not preclude the
Office of Group Insurance from implementing positive plan changes as iden-
tified.
SECTION 14. GROUP INSURANCE PREMIUMS. The Office of Group Insurance
shall maintain the current structure of the state of Idaho Group Health In-
surance Plan's offerings and shall not increase employee premiums, copays,
and deductibles from the fiscal year 2026 rates. The Department of Admin-
istration may use any reserve accounts in the Employee Group Insurance Fund
to pay the employee premium increases planned for fiscal year 2027. The Of-
fice of Group Insurance shall maintain a reduced employee share of covered
charges for fiscal year 2027 with no reduction in benefits. Adherence with
the plan structure shall not preclude the Office of Group Insurance from
adopting any administrative or other cost-savings initiatives it has iden-
tified.
SECTION 15. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORT FOR TAX COLLECTIONS AND DISTRIBU-
TIONS. As provided for in Section 67-702 (1)(c), Idaho Code, the Legislative


Audits Division of the Legislative Services Office will perform a review of
the State Tax Commission's comparative statement of receipts and distribu-
tions for fiscal years 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, and 2025. This review will
include an evaluation of the accuracy of reported collections and distri-
butions for each tax type the commission is responsible for administering.
Specifically, the review will evaluate whether distributions are in accor-
dance with Idaho Code. The report will indicate whether there were material
anomalies regarding distributions.
SECTION 16. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies who are au-
thorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 17. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions in this act.
SECTION 18. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.